Maine, session 132, LD1488.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 28-B MRSA §605, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. B, §120, is
further amended to read:
4. No subsequent further processing, manufacturing or alteration. Since the
performance of the prior testing under subsection 1, the cannabis or cannabis product has
not undergone any further processing, manufacturing or alteration that would result in an
increase in the concentration of any contaminants or factors identified in section 602,
subsection 1 or in any rules adopted by the office pursuant to that section. For the purposes
of this subsection, "further processing, manufacturing or alteration" does not include the
use of cannabis concentrate in the creation of an edible cannabis product, except for testing
under section 602, subsection 1, paragraph F.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 1 - 132LR1746(08)